Wisconsin, session 2025, AB887.
do enact as follows:AB887,13Section 1. 84.02 (5) (d) 2. r. of the statutes is created to read:AB887,1,5484.02 (5) (d) 2. r. The Platteville Veteran’s Memorial in the city of Platteville 5in Grant County.AB887,21Section 2. Initial applicability.AB887,2,32(1) This act first applies to highway maps published after the effective date of 3this subsection.AB887,2,44